California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) Maintain and operate counseling and educational centers, or contract with community-based organizations or public agencies to provide vocational training or skills, counseling and mental health resources, educational supports, and arts, recreation, and other youth development services. These services may be provided separately or in conjunction with crisis resolution homes to be operated by the probation officer. The probation officer shall be authorized
 to make referrals to those organizations when available.

(4) Refer an offense to a youth, peer, or teen court established and maintained by the probation officer or by a community-based organization, Indian tribe, tribal court, or private or public agency, to implement restorative justice practices designed to enable peer youth jurors to hear cases and make dispositions for offenses committed by youths. Such referral offenses may include, but are not limited to, infractions or misdemeanors specified in subdivisions (a) to (v), inclusive, of Section 48900 of the Education Code, or for any other violation the probation officer may determine appropriate for referral. This provision shall be implemented consistent with subdivision (w) of Section 48900
 of the Education Code.

At the conclusion of the program of supervision undertaken pursuant to this section, the probation officer shall prepare and maintain a followup report of the actual program measures taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

654.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 654 or any other provision of law, in any case in which a minor has been charged with a violation of Section 23140 or 23152 of the Vehicle Code, the probation officer may, in lieu of requesting that a petition be filed by the prosecuting attorney to declare the minor a ward of the court under Section 602, proceed in accordance with Section 654 and delineate a program of supervision for the minor. However, the probation officer shall cause the citation for a violation of Section 23140 or 23152 of the Vehicle Code to be heard and disposed of by the judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer pursuant to Sections 257 and 258 as a condition of any program of supervision.

(b) This section may not be construed to prevent the probation officer from requesting the prosecuting attorney to file a petition to declare the minor a ward of the court under Section 602 for a violation of Section 23140 or 23152 of the Vehicle Code. However, if in the judgment of the probation officer, the interest of the minor and the community can be protected by adjudication of a violation of Section 23140 or 23152 of the Vehicle Code in accordance with subdivision (a), the probation officer shall proceed under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

654.2.

(a) If a petition has been filed by the prosecuting attorney to declare a minor a ward of the court under Section 602, the court may, without adjudging the minor a ward of the court and with the consent of the minor and the minor’s parents or guardian, continue any hearing on a petition for six months and order the minor to participate in a program of supervision as set forth in Section 654. If the probation officer recommends additional time to enable the minor to complete the program, the court at its discretion may order an extension. Fifteen days prior to the final conclusion of the program of supervision undertaken pursuant to this section, the probation officer shall submit to the court a followup
 report of the minor’s participation in the program. The minor and the minor’s parents or guardian shall be ordered to appear at the conclusion of the six-month period and at the conclusion of each additional three-month period. If the minor successfully completes the program of supervision, the court shall order the petition be dismissed. If the minor has not successfully completed the program of supervision, proceedings on the petition shall proceed no later than 12 months from the date the petition was filed.

(b) If the minor is eligible for Section 654 supervision, and the probation officer believes the minor would benefit from a program of supervision pursuant to this section, the probation officer may, in referring the affidavit described in Section 653.5 to the prosecuting attorney, recommend informal supervision as provided in this
 section.

(c) A minor shall be given equal consideration for informal probation pursuant to Section 654.3 regardless of whether the minor lives in the county where the offense occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 782, Sec. 7.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

654.3.

(a) A minor shall not be eligible for the program of supervision set forth in Section 654 or 654.2 in the following cases, except where the interests of justice would best be served and the court specifies on the record the reasons for its decision:

(1) A petition alleges that the minor has violated Section 245.5, 626.9, or 626.10 of the Penal Code.

(2) A petition alleges that the minor has violated Section 186.22 of the Penal Code.

(3) The minor has previously participated in a program of supervision pursuant to Section 654.

(4) The minor has previously been adjudged a ward
 of the court pursuant to Section 602.

(5) (A) A petition alleges that the minor has violated an offense in which the restitution owed to the victim exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000). However, a minor’s inability to pay restitution due to the minor’s indigence shall not be grounds for finding a minor ineligible for the program of supervision or a finding that the minor has failed to comply with the terms of the program of supervision.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the definition of “victim” in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 730.6 and “restitution” in subdivision (h) of Section 730.6 shall apply.

(b) A minor shall not be eligible for the program of supervision set forth in Section 654 or 654.2 in the case of a petition alleging that the minor has violated an offense listed
 in subdivision (b) of Section 707, except in unusual cases where the court determines the interests of justice would be best served and the court specified on the record the reason for its decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 850, Sec. 2.   (AB 1643)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

654.4.

Any minor who is placed in a program of supervision set forth in Section 654 or 654.2 for a violation of an offense involving the unlawful possession, use, sale, or other furnishing of a controlled substance, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, or for violating subdivision (f) of Section 647 of the Penal Code or Section 23140 or 23152 of the Vehicle Code, shall be required to participate in and successfully complete an alcohol or drug education program from a county mental health agency or other appropriate community program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1117, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

654.6.

A program of supervision pursuant to Section 654 or 654.2 for any minor described in Section 602 shall include constructive assignments that will help the minor learn to be responsible for his or her actions. The assignments may include, but not be limited to, requiring the minor to perform at least 10 hours of community service, requiring the minor to repair damaged property or to make other appropriate restitution, or requiring the minor to participate in an educational or counseling program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 10.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

655.

(a) When any person has applied to the probation officer, pursuant to Section 653, to request commencement of juvenile court proceedings to declare a minor a ward of the court under Section 602 and the probation officer does not cause the affidavit to be taken to the prosecuting attorney pursuant to Section 653 within 21 court days after such application, the applicant may, within 10 court days after receiving notice of the probation officer’s decision not to file a petition, apply to the prosecuting attorney to review the decision of the probation officer, and the prosecuting attorney may either affirm the decision of the probation officer or commence juvenile court proceedings. 

(b) When any person has applied to the probation officer or the district attorney, pursuant to Section 653, to commence juvenile court proceedings to declare a minor a dependent child of the court or a ward of the court under Section 601 and the probation officer or district attorney fails to file a petition within 21 court days after making such application, the applicant may, within 10 court days after receiving notice of the probation officer’s or district attorney’s decision not to file a petition, apply to the juvenile court to review the decision of the probation officer or district attorney, and the court may either affirm the decision of the probation officer or district attorney or order him or her to commence juvenile court proceedings. 

(c) Nothing in subdivision (b) shall be construed so as to allow district attorneys to file a petition to make a minor a ward of the court under Section 601, except as specifically allowed by Section 653 in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 601.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1202, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

655.5.

When an officer has referred or delivered a minor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 626, and the referral agency does not initiate a service program for the minor within the time periods required by Section 652.5, the referring agency may within 10 court days following receipt of the notification by the referral agency, apply to the probation officer for a review of that decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 260, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

656.

A petition to commence proceedings in the juvenile court to declare a minor a ward of the court shall be verified and shall contain all of the following:

(a) The name of the court to which it is addressed.

(b) The title of the proceeding.

(c) The code section and subdivision under which the proceedings are instituted.

(d) The name, age, and address, if any, of the minor upon whose behalf the petition is brought.

(e) The names
 and residence addresses, if known to the petitioner, of both of the parents and any guardian of the minor. If there is no parent or guardian residing within the state, or if his or her place of residence is not known to the petitioner, the petition shall also contain the name and residence address, if known, of any adult relative residing within the county, or, if there are none, the adult relative residing nearest to the location of the court.

(f) A concise statement of facts, separately stated, to support the conclusion that the minor upon whose behalf the petition is being brought is a person within the definition of each of the sections and subdivisions under which the proceedings are being instituted.

(g) The fact that the minor upon whose behalf the petition is brought is
 detained in custody or is not detained in custody, and if he or she is detained in custody, the date and the precise time the minor was taken into custody.

(h) In a proceeding alleging that the minor comes within Section 601, notice to the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor that failure to comply with the compulsory school attendance laws is an infraction, which may be charged and prosecuted before the juvenile court judge sitting as a superior court judge. In those cases, the petition shall also include notice that the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor has the right to a hearing on the infraction before a judge different than the judge who has heard or is to hear the proceeding pursuant to Section 601. The notice shall explain the provisions of Section 170.6 of the
 Code of Civil Procedure.

(i) If a proceeding is pending against a minor child for a violation of Section 594.2, 640.5, 640.6, or 640.7 of the Penal Code, a notice to the parent or legal guardian of the minor that if the minor is found to have violated either or both of these provisions that (1) any community service that may be required of the minor may be performed in the presence, and under the direct supervision, of the parent or legal guardian pursuant to either or both of these provisions, and (2) if the minor is personally unable to pay any fine levied for the violation of either or both of these provisions, that the parent or legal guardian of the minor shall be liable for payment of the fine pursuant to those sections.

(j) A notice to the parent or guardian of the minor that if
 the minor is ordered to make restitution to the victim pursuant to Section 729.6, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, Section 731.1, as operative on or before August 2, 1995, or Section 730.6, or to pay fines or penalty assessments, the parent or guardian may be liable for the payment of restitution, fines, or penalty assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 11.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

656.1.

Any petition alleging that the minor is a person described by Section 602 shall specify as to each count whether the crime charged is a felony or a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1071.)
-------------------------------------------

656.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a victim shall have the right to present a victim impact statement in all juvenile court hearings concerning petitions filed pursuant to Section 602 alleging the commission of any criminal offense. In any case in which a minor is alleged to have committed a criminal offense, the probation officer shall inform the victim of the rights of victims to submit a victim impact statement. If the victim exercises the right to submit a victim impact statement to the probation officer, the probation officer is encouraged to include the statement in his or her social study submitted to the court pursuant to Section 706 and, if applicable, in his or her report submitted to the court pursuant to
 Section 707. The probation officer also shall advise those persons as to the time and place of the disposition hearing to be conducted pursuant to Sections 702 and 706; any fitness hearing to be conducted pursuant to Section 707, and any other judicial proceeding concerning the case.

(2) The officer shall also provide the victim with information concerning the victim’s right to an action for civil damages against the minor and his or her parents and the victim’s opportunity to be compensated from the restitution fund. The information shall be in the form of written material prepared by the Judicial Council and shall be provided to each victim for whom the probation officer has a current mailing address.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the persons from whom the probation officer is required to solicit a statement pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have the right to attend the
 disposition hearing conducted pursuant to Section 702 and to express their views concerning the offense and disposition of the case pursuant to Section 706, to attend any fitness hearing conducted pursuant to Section 707, and to be present during juvenile proceedings as provided in Section 676.5.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, in any case in which a minor is alleged to have committed an act subject to a fitness hearing under Section 707, the victim shall have the right to be informed of all court dates and continuances pertaining to the case, and shall further have the right to obtain copies of the charging petition, the minutes of the proceedings, and orders of adjudications and disposition of the court that are contained in the court file. The arresting agency shall notify the victim in a timely manner of the address and telephone number of the juvenile branch of the district attorney’s office that will be
 responsible for the case and for informing the victim of the victim’s right to attend hearings and obtain documents as provided in this section. The district attorney shall, upon request, inform the victim of the date of the fitness hearing, the date of the disposition hearing, and the dates for any continuances of those hearings, and shall inform the court if the victim seeks to exercise his or her right to obtain copies of the documents described in this subdivision.

(2) Where the proceeding against the minor is based on a felony that is not listed in Section 676, a victim who obtains information about the minor under this subdivision shall not disclose or disseminate this information beyond his or her immediate family or support persons authorized by Section 676, unless authorized to do so by a judge of the juvenile court, and the judge may suspend or terminate the right of the victim to access to information under this subdivision if the
 information is improperly disclosed or disseminated by the victim or any members of his or her immediate family. The intentional dissemination of documents in violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). Documents released by the court to a victim pursuant to this section shall be stamped as confidential and with a statement that the unlawful dissemination of the documents is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(d) Upon application of the district attorney for good cause and a showing of potential danger to the public, the court may redact any information contained in any documents released by the court to a victim pursuant to this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “victim” means the victim, the parent or guardian of the victim if the victim is a
 minor, or, if the victim has died, the victim’s next of kin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 91.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

656.5.

Any petition filed in juvenile court to commence proceedings pursuant to this chapter that is not verified may be dismissed without prejudice by such court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 897.)
-------------------------------------------

657.

(a) Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the juvenile court shall set the same for hearing within 30 days, except as follows:

(1) In the case of a minor detained in custody at the time of the filing of the petition, the petition must be set for hearing within 15 judicial days from the date of the order of the court directing such detention.

(2) In the case of a minor not before the juvenile court at the time of the filing of the petition and for whom a warrant of arrest has been issued pursuant to Section 663, the hearing on the petition shall be stayed until the minor is brought before the juvenile court on the warrant of arrest. The clerk of the juvenile court shall set the petition for hearing within 30 days of the minor’s initial appearance in juvenile court on the petition, except that in the case of a minor detained in custody, the petition shall be set for hearing within 15 judicial days from the date of the order of the court directing such detention.

(b) At the detention hearing, or any time thereafter, a minor who is alleged to come within the provisions of Section 601 or 602, may, with the consent of counsel, admit in court the allegations of the petition and waive the jurisdictional hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

658.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the juvenile court shall issue a notice, to which shall be attached a copy of the petition, and he or she shall cause the same to be served upon the minor, if the minor is eight or more years of age, and upon each of the persons described in subdivision (e) of Section 656 whose residence addresses are set forth in the petition and thereafter before the hearing upon all persons whose residence addresses become known to the clerk. If the court has ordered the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for foster care placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727, the
 clerk shall also issue a copy of that notice to any foster parents, preadoptive parents, legal guardians, or relatives providing care to the minor. The clerk shall issue a copy of the petition, to the minor’s attorney and to the district attorney, if the district attorney has notified the clerk of the court that he or she wishes to receive the petition, containing the time, date, and place of the hearing. Service under this subdivision may be by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, except that electronic service is not authorized if the minor is detained and those persons entitled to notice are not present at the initial detention hearing.

(b) Upon the filing of a supplemental petition where the minor has been declared a ward of the court or a probationer under Section 602 in the original matter, the clerk of the juvenile court shall
 issue a notice, to which shall be attached a copy of the petition, and he or she shall cause the notice to be served upon the minor, if the minor is eight or more years of age, and upon each of the persons described in subdivision (e) of Section 656 whose residence addresses are set forth in the supplemental petition and thereafter known to the clerk. The clerk shall issue a copy of the supplemental petition to the minor’s attorney, and to the district attorney if the probation officer is the petitioner, or, to the probation officer if the district attorney is the petitioner, containing the time, date, and place of the hearing. If the court has ordered the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for foster care placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727, the clerk shall also issue a copy of that notice to any foster parents, preadoptive
 parents, legal guardians, or relatives providing care to the minor. Service under this subdivision may be by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 138.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

659.

The notice shall contain all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the person to whom the notice is directed.

(b) The date, time, and place of the hearing on the petition.

(c) The name of the minor upon whose behalf the petition has been brought.

(d) Each section and subdivision under which the proceeding has been instituted.

(e) A statement that the minor and his or her parent or guardian or adult relative, as the case may
 be, to whom notice is required to be given, are entitled to have an attorney present at the hearing on the petition, and that, if the parent or guardian or the adult relative is indigent and cannot afford an attorney, and the minor or his or her parent or guardian or the adult relative desires to be represented by an attorney, the parent or guardian or adult relative shall promptly notify the clerk of the juvenile court, and that in the event counsel or legal assistance is furnished by the court, the parent or guardian or adult relative shall be liable to the county, to the extent of his, her, or their financial ability, for all or a portion of the cost thereof, but he or shall not be liable for the cost of counsel or legal assistance furnished by the court for purposes of representing the minor.

(f) A statement that the parent or guardian of
 the minor may be liable for the payment of restitution, fines, or penalty assessments if the minor is ordered to make restitution to the victim or to pay fines or penalty assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 678, Sec. 12.   (SB 190)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

660.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if the minor is detained, the clerk of the juvenile court shall cause the notice and copy of the petition to be served on all persons required to receive that notice and copy of the petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 656 and Section 658, either personally or by certified mail with request for return receipt, as soon as possible after filing of the petition and at least five days before the time set for hearing, unless the hearing is set less than five days from the filing of the petition, in which case, the notice and copy of the petition shall be served at least 24 hours before the time set for hearing. Service under this subdivision shall not be made by
 electronic service.

(b) If the minor is detained, and all persons entitled to notice pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 656 and Section 658 were present at the detention hearing, the clerk of the juvenile court shall cause the notice and copy of the petition to be served on all persons required to receive the notice and copy of the petition, by personal service, by first-class mail, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, as soon as possible after the filing of the petition and at least five days before the time set for hearing, unless the hearing is set less than five days from the filing of the petition, in which case the notice and copy of the petition shall be served at least 24 hours before the time set for the hearing. Service under this subdivision may be by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5 except that
 electronic service is not authorized if the minor is detained and those persons entitled to notice are not present at the detention hearing.

(c) If the minor is not detained, the clerk of the juvenile court shall cause the notice and copy of the petition to be served on all persons required to receive the notice and copy of the petition, by personal service, by first-class mail, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5 at least 10 days before the time set for hearing. If that person is known to reside outside of the county, the clerk of the juvenile court shall serve the notice and copy of the petition, by first-class mail or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, to that person, as soon as possible after the filing of the petition and at least 10 days before the time set for hearing. Failure to respond to the notice shall
 in no way result in arrest or detention. In the instance of failure to appear after notice by first-class mail or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5, the court shall direct that the notice and copy of the petition is to be personally served on all persons required to receive the notice and a copy of the petition. However, if the whereabouts of the minor are unknown, personal service of the notice and a copy of the petition is not required and a warrant for the arrest of the minor may be issued pursuant to Section 663. Personal service of the notice and copy of the petition outside of the county at least 10 days before the time set for hearing is equivalent to service by first-class mail or electronic service. Service may be waived by any person by a voluntary appearance entered in the minutes of the court or by a written waiver of service filed with the clerk of the court at or prior
 to the hearing.

(d) For purposes of this section, service on the minor’s attorney shall constitute service on the minor’s parent or legal guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 139.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Note: This section was amended on March 7, 2000, by initiative Prop. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

660.5.

(a) This section shall be known as the Expedited Youth Accountability Program. It shall be operative in the superior court in Los Angeles County. It shall also be operative in any other county in which a committee consisting of the sheriff, the chief probation officer, the district attorney, the public defender, and the presiding judge of the superior court votes to participate in the program, upon approval by the board of supervisors.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to hold nondetained, delinquent youth accountable for their crimes in a swift and certain manner.

(c) Each county participating in the Expedited Youth Accountability Program shall establish
 agreed upon time deadlines for law enforcement, probation, district attorney, and court functions which shall assure that a case which is to proceed pursuant to this section shall be ready to be heard within 60 calendar days after the minor is cited to the court.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 658, 659, and 660, if a minor, who is between 12 years of age and 17 years of age, inclusive, is not detained for any misdemeanor or felony offense and is not cited to Informal Juvenile and Traffic Court pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (15), inclusive, of Section 256 and Section 853.6a of the Penal Code, the peace officer or probation officer releasing the minor shall issue a citation and obtain a written promise to appear in juvenile
 court, or record the minor’s refusal to sign the promise to appear and serve a notice to appear in juvenile court. The appearance shall not be set for more than 60 calendar days nor less than 10 calendar days from the issuance of the citation. If the 60th day falls on a court holiday, the appearance date shall be on the next date that the court is in session. The date set for the appearance of the minor shall allow for sufficient time for the probation department to evaluate eligible minors for informal handling under Section 654 or any other disposition provided by law. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or conflict with Sections 653.1 and 653.5.

(2) Upon receipt of the citation and petition, but in no event less than 72 hours, excluding nonjudicial days and holidays prior to the hearing, the clerk of the juvenile court shall issue a copy of the citation and petition to the public defender or the minor’s attorney of
 record. If a copy of the citation and petition is not provided at least 72 hours, excluding nonjudicial days and holidays prior to the hearing, it shall be grounds to request a continuance pursuant to Sections 682 and 700. At a hearing conducted under Section 700, the minor and minor’s parent or guardian shall be furnished a copy of the petition and any other material required to be provided under Section 659.

(3) The original citation and promise or notice to appear shall be retained by the court if a petition is filed. In addition, there shall be three copies of the citation and promise or notice to appear, which shall be distributed as follows:

(A) One copy shall be provided to the person to whom the citation is issued.

(B) One copy shall be provided to the probation department.

(C) If a petition is requested, the second copy of the citation shall go to the district attorney along with the petition request, and the third copy shall be retained by the agency issuing the citation.

(4) The original citation shall include a copy of all police reports relating to the citation and a petition request. The citation shall contain the following information:

(A) Date, time, and location of the issuance of the citation.

(B) The name, address, telephone number if known, driver’s license number, age, date of birth, sex, race, height, weight, hair color, and color of eyes of the person to whom the citation is issued.

(C) A list of the offenses and the location where the offense or
 offenses were committed.

(D) Date and time of the required court appearance.

(E) Address of the juvenile court where the person to whom the citation is issued is to appear.

(F) A preprinted promise to appear which is signed by the person to whom the citation is issued, or where the person refused to sign the written promise, the notice to appear.

(G) A preprinted declaration under penalty of perjury that the above information is true and correct, signed by the peace officer or probation officer issuing the citation.

(H) A statement that the failure to appear is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(e) The minor’s parent or guardian
 shall be issued a citation in the same manner as described in subdivision (b).

(f) The willful failure to appear in court pursuant to a citation or notice issued as required pursuant to this section is a misdemeanor.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Section 662, if a parent or guardian to whom a citation has been issued pursuant to this section fails to appear, a warrant of arrest may issue for that person. A warrant of arrest may also issue for a parent or guardian who is not personally served where efforts to effect personal service have been unsuccessful, upon an affidavit, under penalty of perjury, signed by a peace officer stating facts sufficient to establish that all reasonable efforts to locate the person have failed or that the person has willfully evaded service of process.

(2) Notwithstanding
 Section 663, if a minor to whom a citation has been issued pursuant to this section fails to appear, and the minor’s parent or guardian has either appeared or the prerequisite conditions for issuing a warrant against the minor’s parent or guardian under paragraph (1) have been met, a warrant of arrest may issue for the minor.

(3) A warrant of arrest may also issue for a minor who is not personally served where each of the following occur:

(A) Efforts to effect personal service have been unsuccessful.

(B) An affidavit is submitted under penalty of perjury, signed by a peace officer, stating facts sufficient to establish that all reasonable efforts to locate the minor have failed or that minor has willfully evaded service of process.

(C) The minor’s
 parent or guardian has either appeared or the prerequisite conditions for issuing a warrant against the minor’s parent or guardian under paragraph (1) have been met.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding Section 654 or any other provision of law, a probation officer in a county in which this subdivision is applicable may, in lieu of filing a petition or proceeding under Section 654, issue a citation in the form described in subdivision (d) to the Informal Juvenile and Traffic Court pursuant to Section 256 for any misdemeanor except the following:

(A) Any crime involving a firearm.

(B) Any crime involving violence.

(C) Any crime involving a sex-related offense.

(D) Any minor who has
 previously been declared a ward of the court.

(E) Any minor who has previously been referred to juvenile traffic court pursuant to this section.

(2) This subdivision shall apply only if the case will be heard by a juvenile hearing officer who meets the minimum qualifications of a juvenile court referee and only in those counties in which a committee consisting of the sheriff, the chief probation officer, the district attorney, the public defender, and the presiding judge of the superior court vote for this subdivision to apply and then only upon approval of the board of supervisors. This approval shall be required in Los Angeles and all other counties participating in the program, and shall be in addition to that required by subdivision (a) for participation in the Expedited Youth Accountability Program.

(3) In
 counties in which this subdivision is applicable, the probation department shall conduct a risk and needs assessment for each minor eligible for citation to the Informal Juvenile and Traffic Court pursuant to paragraph (1). The risk and needs assessment shall consider the best interest of the minor and the protection of the community. It shall also include an assessment of whether the child has any significant problems in the home, school, or community, whether the matter appears to have arisen from a temporary problem within the family which has been or can be resolved, and whether any agency or other resource in the community is better suited to serve the needs of the child, the parent or guardian, or both.

(i) In the event that the probation officer places a minor on informal probation or cites the minor to Informal Juvenile and Traffic Court, or elects some other lawful disposition not requiring the hearing set forth in subdivision (b), the
 probation officer shall so inform the minor and his or her parent or guardian no later than 72 hours, excluding nonjudicial days and holidays, prior to the hearing, that a court appearance is not required.

(j) Except as modified by this section, the requirements of this chapter shall remain in full force and effect.

(k) This section shall be operative on January 1, 1998, and shall be implemented in all branches of the juvenile court in Los Angeles County on or before July 1, 1998.

(l) It is the intent of the Legislature that an interim hearing be conducted by appropriate policy committees in the Legislature prior to January 1, 2002, to examine the success of the program in expediting punishment for juvenile offenses, reducing delinquent behavior, and promoting greater accountability on the part of juvenile
 offenders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 193, Sec. 4.   (SB 1484)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

(a) In addition to the notice provided in Sections 658 and 659, the juvenile court may issue a citation directing any parent, guardian, or foster parent of the person concerning whom a petition has been filed to appear at the time and place set for any hearing or financial evaluation under the provisions of this chapter, including a hearing under the provisions of Section 257, and directing any person having custody or control of the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed to bring the minor with him or her.

(b) The notice shall in addition state that a parent, guardian, or foster parent may be required to participate in a counseling or education
 program with the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed.

(c) If the proceeding is one alleging that the minor comes within the provisions of Section 601, the notice shall in addition contain notice to the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor that failure to comply with the compulsory school attendance laws is an infraction, which may be charged and prosecuted before the juvenile court judge sitting as a superior court judge. In those cases, the notice shall also include notice that the parent, guardian, or other person having control or charge of the minor has the right to a hearing on the infraction before a judge different than the judge who has heard or is to hear the proceeding pursuant to Section 601. The notice shall also explain the provisions of Section 170.6 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure.

(d) Personal service of the citation shall be made at least 24 hours before the time stated therein for the appearance. The citation may also be electronically served pursuant to Section 212.5, but only in addition to service by other forms of service required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 140.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

662.
